Utah statutes.
22-7-112.   Effect of conversion or reconversion on governing instrument.

Conversion to a total return unitrust under the provisions of this chapter may not affect any other provision of the governing instrument, if any, regarding distributions of principal.  If a total return unitrust is reconverted to an income trust, the trustee's release of the trustee's power under Section 22-7-104, if it was given at the time the trust was converted to a total return unitrust, is void when the trust is reconverted.



Enacted by Chapter 244, 2013 General Session

